District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.01

Establishment.

There is hereby established a Commission on Aging to advise the Mayor, the Director of the Office on Aging, the Council of the District of Columbia, and the public concerning the views and needs of the aged in the District of Columbia.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 401, 22 DCR 2460
Oct. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-42, § 9(b)(2), 28 DCR 3425
This section is referenced in § 7-502.01 and § 7-503.05.
1981 Ed., § 6-2221.
1973 Ed., § 6-1721.